Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 45.75.360.
Hindering or obstructing officer and penalty. [Repealed, § 5 ch 85 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 45.75.370.
Impersonation of officer and penalties. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For current law, see AS 11.56.830.]

Sec. 45.75.380.
Offenses and penalties.

A person commits a violation subject to the penalty specified in AS

12.55.035(b)(7)

if the person does one or more of the following acts:

uses or has in possession for the purpose of using for a commercial purpose specified in AS

45.75.080

, sells, offers, or exposes for sale, or hire, or has in possession for the purpose of selling or hiring, an incorrect weight or measure or a device or instrument used to or calculated to falsify a weight or measure;

uses or has in possession for current use, in buying or selling a commodity or thing, or for hire or award, or in the computation of a basic charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of weight or measurement, or in the determination of weight or measurement when a charge is made for determination, a weight or measure that has not been tested and sealed by the appropriate authority within one year, unless

the person gives written notice to the appropriate authority to the effect that the weight or measure is available for examination, or is due for reexamination, as the case may be;

the person receives specific written permission to use the weight or measure from the appropriate authority; or

the weight or measure is exempt from sealing or annual testing requirements by AS

45.75.080

or by a regulation adopted under AS

45.75.050

;

disposes of a rejected or condemned weight or measure in a manner contrary to law or regulation;

removes from a weight or measure, contrary to law or regulation, a tag, seal, or mark placed on it by the appropriate authority;

sells or offers for sale less than the quantity the person represents of a commodity, thing, or service;

takes more than the quantity the person represents of a commodity, thing, or service when, as buyer, the person furnished the weight or measure that the seller used to determine the amount of the commodity, thing, or service;

keeps for the purpose of sale, advertises, or offers for sale, or sells a commodity, thing, or service in a condition or manner contrary to law or regulation;

uses in retail trade, except in the preparation of packages put up in advance of sale and of medical prescriptions, a weight or measure that is not so positioned that a customer may accurately read, from a position that may reasonably be assumed by a customer, its indications and observe the weighing or measuring operation;

hinders or obstructs the director, an inspector, a sealer, or a deputy sealer in the performance of official duties under this chapter;

violates a provision of an overweight or oversize vehicle permit issued under AS

19.10.060(b)

;

violates a weight, load, or size limitation established under AS

19.10.060

or a regulation adopted under AS

19.05.020

, AS

19.10.060

, or AS

45.75.050(b)(5)

;

violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter for which a specific penalty is not prescribed.

Notwithstanding the maximum fine for a violation provided under (a) of this section, a person who does one or more of the acts in (a)(10) or (11) of this section, shall pay a penalty as follows:

if the vehicle is 1,001 — 2,000 pounds overweight, the fine is $100;

if the vehicle is 2,001 — 4,000 pounds overweight, the fine is $.07 for each pound over the weight limitation;

if the vehicle is 4,001 — 6,000 pounds overweight, the fine is $.09 for each pound over the weight limitation;

if the vehicle is 6,001 — 10,000 pounds overweight, the fine is $.12 for each pound over the weight limitation;

if the vehicle is 10,001 or more pounds overweight, the fine is $.15 for each pound over the weight limitation.

History.

(§ 39 ch 101 SLA 1961; am §§ 3, 4 ch 85 SLA 1987; am E.O. No. 98 § 15 (1997); am § 20 ch 48 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 131 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 81 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For the effect of the 2006 reenactment of (b) of this section on Rule 43.6, Alaska Rules of Administration, as those relate to the maximum fine for overweight vehicle violations, see §§ 3 and 4, ch. 81, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For weighing and measuring device registration and fees, see 17 AAC 90, art. 9.

For definitions, see 17 AAC 90, art. 10.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5(b), ch. 81, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 reenactment of (b) of this section applies “to an offense committed on or after June 29, 2006.”

Sec. 45.75.390.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“barrel,” when used in connection with fermented liquor, means a unit of 31 gallons;

“commodity in package form” means a commodity put up or packaged in any manner in advance of sale in units suitable for wholesale or retail sale, but does not include an auxiliary shipping container enclosing packages that individually conform to the requirements of this chapter; an individual item or lot of a commodity not in package form, but on which there is marked a selling price based on an established price per unit of weight or of measure, is a commodity in package form;

“consumer package” or “package of consumer commodity” means a commodity in package form that is customarily produced or distributed for sale through retail sales agencies or instrumentalities for consumption by individuals or use by individuals for the purposes of personal care or in the performance of services ordinarily rendered in or about the household or in connection with personal possessions;

“cord,” when used in connection with wood intended for fuel purposes, means the amount of wood that is contained in a space of 128 cubic feet when the wood is ranked and well stowed;

“director” means the state director of weights and measures and “deputy director” means the deputy state director of weights and measures;

“inspector” means a state inspector of weights and measures;

“intrastate commerce” means commerce or trade that is begun, carried on, and completed wholly within the limits of the state;

“nonconsumer package” or “package of nonconsumer commodity” means a commodity in package form other than a consumer package, and particularly a package designed solely for industrial or institutional use or for wholesale distribution only;

“sealer” means a sealer of weights and measures and “deputy sealer” means a deputy sealer of weights and measures of a city;

“sell” includes barter and exchange;

“ton” means a unit of 2,000 pounds avoirdupois weight;

“weight” in connection with a commodity means net weight; when a commodity is sold on the basis of weight, the net weight of the commodity shall be used, and all contracts concerning the commodity shall be so construed;

“weight and measure” means every weight and measure, instrument and device for weighing and measuring, and every appliance and accessory associated with an instrument and device.

History.

(§§ 2, 4, 26 ch 101 SLA 1961; am § 9 ch 78 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 45.75.400.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Weights and Measures Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1961)